dev/apertium-en-de/apertium-en-de.de.dix
    <pardef n="R/ad__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>ad</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ads</l>     <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ad</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ad</l>      <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äder</l>    <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äder</l>    <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ädern</l>   <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>äder</l>    <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>ades</l>    <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>ade</l>     <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Absurd/um__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>um</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ums</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>um</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>um</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>a</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>a</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>a</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>a</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ser/um__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>um</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>ums</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>um</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>um</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>a</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>a</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>a</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>a</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/Abt__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>Abt</l>     <r>Abt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>Abts</l>    <r>Abt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>Abt</l>     <r>Abt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>Abt</l>     <r>Abt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>Äbte</l>    <r>Abt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>Äbte</l>    <r>Abt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>Äbten</l>   <r>Abt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>Äbte</l>    <r>Abt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>Abtes</l>   <r>Abt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>   <l>Abte</l>    <r>Abt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Abteil__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>s</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>e</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="W/asser__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l>asser</l>   <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>assers</l>  <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>asser</l>   <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>asser</l>   <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>asser</l>   <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>asser</l>   <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>assern</l>  <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>asser</l>   <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p>   <l>ässer</l>   <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p>   <l>ässer</l>   <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p>   <l>ässern</l>  <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p>   <l>ässer</l>   <r>asser<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Frau__n">
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>  </p></e>
      <e>       <p>   <l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>  </p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Absonderung"><i>Absonderung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Abt"><i></i><par n="/Abt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ahnung"><i>Ahnung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Anerkennung"><i>Anerkennung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Anstrengung"><i>Anstrengung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Antibiotikum"><i>Antibiotik</i><par n="Absurd/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Antiseptikum"><i>Antiseptik</i><par n="Absurd/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Arbeitszeit"><i>Arbeitszeit</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Auflösung"><i>Auflösung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Auseinandersetzung"><i>Auseinandersetzung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Auswirkung"><i>Auswirkung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bad"><i>B</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Banküberweisung"><i>Banküberweisung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Befreiung"><i>Befreiung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Beherrschung"><i>Beherrschung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Berechnung"><i>Berechnung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Besprechung"><i>Besprechung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bewegung"><i>Bewegung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bootsfahrt"><i>Bootsfahrt</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bundesregierung"><i>Bundesregierung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dampfbad"><i>Dampfb</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Definition"><i>Definition</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Discothek"><i>Discothek</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ehefrau"><i>Ehefrau</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Einsamkeit"><i>Einsamkeit</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Emanzipation"><i>Emanzipation</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Enttäuschung"><i>Enttäuschung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ermäßigung"><i>Ermäßigung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Erzählung"><i>Erzählung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fahrlässigkeit"><i>Fahrlässigkeit</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fahrrad"><i>Fahrr</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Feststellung"><i>Feststellung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Flugzeit"><i>Flugzeit</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Freiheit"><i>Freiheit</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Frischwasser"><i>Frischw</i><par n="W/asser__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Geltung"><i>Geltung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gleichheit"><i>Gleichheit</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Haustür"><i>Haustür</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Inflation"><i>Inflation</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kapazität"><i>Kapazität</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kooperation"><i>Kooperation</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Landung"><i>Landung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Lenkrad"><i>Lenkr</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Mahlzeit"><i>Mahlzeit</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Maximum"><i>Maxim</i><par n="Absurd/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Mineralwasser"><i>Mineralw</i><par n="W/asser__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Minimum"><i>Minim</i><par n="Absurd/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Mittagszeit"><i>Mittagszeit</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Motorrad"><i>Motorr</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Nationalität"><i>Nationalität</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Ordnung"><i>Ordnung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Praktikum"><i>Praktik</i><par n="Absurd/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Präsentation"><i>Präsentation</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Rad"><i>R</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Reaktion"><i>Reaktion</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Rettung"><i>Rettung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Scheidung"><i>Scheidung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Schwimmbad"><i>Schwimmb</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Seebad"><i>Seeb</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sendung"><i>Sendung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Serum"><i>Ser</i><par n="Ser/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sodawasser"><i>Sodaw</i><par n="W/asser__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Sonnenbad"><i>Sonnenb</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Stabilität"><i>Stabilität</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Steuerrad"><i>Steuerr</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Süßwasser"><i>Süßw</i><par n="W/asser__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tageszeit"><i>Tageszeit</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Thermalbad"><i>Thermalb</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tortur"><i>Tortur</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Trinkwasser"><i>Trinkw</i><par n="W/asser__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Uhr"><i>Uhr</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Verallgemeinerung"><i>Verallgemeinerung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Verpackung"><i>Verpackung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Vision"><i>Vision</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Visum"><i>Vis</i><par n="Absurd/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Wäscherei"><i>Wäscherei</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Wasser"><i>W</i><par n="W/asser__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Windrad"><i>Windr</i><par n="R/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zeichnung"><i>Zeichnung</i><par n="Frau__n"/></e>
